Utah statutes.
34-28-4.   Notice of paydays -- Failure to notify a misdemeanor.
(1) It shall be the duty of every employer to notify his employees at the time
of hiring of the day and place of payment, of the rate of pay, and of any
change with respect to any of these items prior to the time of the change.
Alternatively, however, every employer shall have the option of giving such
notification by posting these facts and keeping them posted conspicuously at
or near the place of work where such posted notice can be seen by each
employee as he comes or goes to his place of work.
(2) Failure to post and to keep posted any notice or failure to give notice as
prescribed in this section shall be deemed a misdemeanor and punishable as
such.
